Hawaii statutes.
§201-73 Powers and duties of director.
In addition to any other powers and duties provided in this part, the director
shall:

(1) Oversee, supervise, and direct the planning,
evaluation, and coordination of space-related activities and identify and promote
opportunities for expanding and diversifying aerospace-related industries in
the State, which may include a Pacific international center for space
exploration systems to support space exploration and settlement;

(2) Initiate discussions for private and
international involvement in space-related activities in the State;

(3) Assist the University of Hawaii, local companies,
research institutions, and other interested organizations in establishing
partnerships with corporate, government, and university entities that can
promote and enhance the State's aerospace industry;

(4) Leverage aerospace and related technological
capabilities in the State's academic, public, and private sectors to enhance
the State's ability to procure both federal and private research and
development grants and to increase the State's competitiveness in national and
global aerospace markets;

(5) Promote innovative education and workforce
development programs that will enhance public awareness of the State's
aerospace potential and enable residents to pursue employment in Hawaii's aerospace industry;

(6) Monitor national and global trends in the
aerospace industry and recommend programs and policies that can support
aerospace industry development statewide;

(7) Review the effectiveness of present publications,
pamphlets, and other sources of information about Hawaii's space-related
activities produced and distributed by the State;

(8) Serve as a clearinghouse for information on Hawaii's space-related activities to include but not be limited to those of the University
of Hawaii and federal agencies located in Hawaii;

(9) Target existing businesses that can provide
products or services of importance to the space industry to support the
expansion of these businesses in Hawaii;

(10) Increase contact and maintain liaison with the
National Aeronautics and Space Administration and other federal agencies and
facilities;

(11) Institute procedures by which citizen input on
proposed space facilities development shall be invited at the earliest possible
time in the development process;

(12) Adopt, amend, and repeal rules pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary to carry out this part;

(13) Contract for services as may be necessary for the
purposes of this part; and

(14) Do all other things necessary or proper to carry
out the purposes of this part. [L 1988, c 355, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 149,
§2(4)]

Revision Note

In first paragraph,
"part" substituted for "chapter".

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next